src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-A-wug-test_gt-desc.yaml
      # kakak - NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS (-im after diminutive, only -isîs diminutive)
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: kakak
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: kakakak
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: kakakis
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: kakakisîs
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nikakak
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nikakaka
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nikakakak
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nikakakim
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nikakakima
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nikakakimak
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: okakaka
      okakakim+?: okakakim
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: okakakima
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nikakakis, nikakakimis]
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nikakakisîs, nikakakimisîs]
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: nikakakisim
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nikakakisîsim
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nikakakinân
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nikakakiminân
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nikakakisinân, nikakakimisinân]
      kakak+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Dim: nikakakisiminân
      
      # wawâs (no -im, lexicalized dimunitive -> neither -is nor -isîs)
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: wawâs
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: wawâsak
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: [wawâsis, wawâsisîs]
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: niwawâs
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: niwawâsa
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: niwawâsak
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: niwawâsim
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: niwawâsima
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: niwawâsimak
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: owawâsa
      owawâsim+?: owawâsim
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: owawâsima
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: [niwawâsis, niwawâsisîs]
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [niwawâsisim, niwawâsisîsim, niwawâsimis, niwawâsimisîs]
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: niwawâsinân
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: niwawâsiminân
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Dim: niwawâsisinân
      wawâs+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [niwawâsimisinân, niwawâsisiminân]

      # nan - NA_SG/A_POSS/IM (singular -a, -im between stem and diminutuve, either -is or -isîs)
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: nana
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: nanak
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Obv: nana
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [nanis, nanisîs]
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: ninana
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: ninana
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: ninanak
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: ninanim
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: ninanima
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: ninanimak
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: onana
      onanim+?: onanim
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: onanima
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [ninanis, ninanisîs, ninanisim, ninanisîsim]
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [ninanimis, ninanimisîs]
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: ninaninân
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: ninaniminân
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [ninanisinân, ninanisiminân]
      nan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: ninanimisinân

      # nin - NA_SG/I_POSS/IM (singular -i, -im between stem and diminutuve, either -is or -isîs)
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: nini
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: ninak
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Obv: nina
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [ninis, ninisîs]
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: ninini
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: ninina
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nininak
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nininim
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nininima
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nininimak
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: onina
      oninim+?: oninim
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: oninima
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nininis, nininisîs, nininisim, nininisîsim]
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nininimis, nininimisîs]
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: ninininân
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nininiminân
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nininisinân, nininisiminân]
      nin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nininimisinân

      # pap - NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS (singular -a, -im between stem and diminutuve, only -is diminutive)
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: papa
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: papak
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Obv: papa
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: papis
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: papisîs
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nipapa
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nipapa
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nipapak
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nipapim
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nipapima
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nipapimak
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: opapa
      opapim+?: opapim
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: opapima
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipapis, nipapisim]
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nipapisîs, nipapisîsim]
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nipapimis
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: nipapimisîs
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nipapinân
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipapiminân
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipapisinân, nipapisiminân]
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Dim: [nipapimisîsinân, nipapimisîsinân]
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nipapisîsinân, nipapisîsiminân]
      pap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipapimisinân

      # pip - NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS (singular -a, -im between stem and diminutuve, only -isîs diminutive)
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: pipa
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: pipak
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Obv: pipa
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: pipisîs
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: pipis
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nipipa
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nipipa
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nipipak
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nipipim
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nipipima
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nipipimak
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: opipa
      opipim+?: opipim
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: opipima
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipipisîs, nipipisîsim]
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nipipis, nipipisim]
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nipipimisîs
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: nipipimis
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nipipinân
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipipiminân
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipipisîsinân, nipipisîsiminân]
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Dim: [nipipimisinân, nipipimisinân]
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nipipisinân, nipipisiminân]
      pip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipipimisîsinân
